Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 459.485 is amended to read:
459.485. (1) As used in this section and ORS 459.488, “compact  fluorescent lamp” and “linear
fluorescent  lamp”  have the meanings given those terms in the California Health and Safety Code,
Division 104, Part 3, chapter 16, section 109020, as in effect on September 24, 2023.
[(2) On or after January 1, 2024, a  person may not sell, offer to sell or distribute in or into this
state a screw- or bayonet-base type compact fluorescent lamp as a new manufactured product. ]
[(3) On or after January 1, 2025, a person may not sell, offer to  sell or distribute in or into this
state a pin-base type  compact fluorescent lamp or a linear fluorescent lamp as a new manufactured
product.]
(2) A person may not sell, offer to sell or distribute in or into this  state, as a new man-
ufactured product, a linear  fluorescent lamp or a pin-, screw- or bayonet-base type compact
fluorescent lamp.
SECTION 2. Section 3, chapter 195, Oregon Laws 2025, is repealed.
SECTION 2a. Notwithstanding section 21, chapter , Oregon Laws 2026 (Enrolled
House Bill 4066) (amending section 3, chapter 195, Oregon Laws 2025), if House Bill 4066 be-
comes law, section 3, chapter 195,  Oregon Laws 2025, is repealed by section 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 459.488, as amended by section 2, chapter 195, Oregon Laws  2025, is amended
to read:
459.488. ORS 459.485 does not apply to:
(1) A lamp  used for image capture and projection, including photocopying, printing, directly or
in preprocessing, lithography, film and video projection and holography.
(2) A lamp that has a high proportion of ultraviolet light emission and is one of the following:
(a) A  lamp with high ultraviolet content that has ultraviolet power greater than two milliwatts
per kilolumen.
(b) A lamp for germicidal use, such as the destruction of DNA (deoxyribonucleic  acid), that
emits a peak radiation of approximately 253.7 nanometers.
(c) A lamp used for disinfection or fly trapping from which either:
(A) The radiation power emitted between  250 and 315 nanometers represents at least five per-
cent of the total radiation power emitted between 250 and 800 nanometers; or
Enrolled House Bill 4060 (HB 4060-A) Page 1
(B) The radiation  power emitted between 315 and 400 nanometers represents at least 20 percent
of the total radiation power emitted between 250 and 800 nanometers.
(d) A lamp used for the generation of ozone where the primary purpose is to  emit radiation at
approximately 185.1 nanometers.
(e) A lamp used for  coral zooxanthellae symbiosis from which the radiation power emitted be-
tween 400 and 480 nanometers represents at least 40 percent  of the total radiation power emitted
between 250 and 800 nanometers.
(f) Any lamp used in an electronic product designed to incorporate one or more ultraviolet lamps
and intended for irradiation of any part of the living human body by ultraviolet  radiation, with
wavelengths in air between 200 and 400 nanometers, to induce skin tanning.
(3) A  lamp used in a medical device or otherwise used for medical or veterinary diagnosis or
treatment.
(4) A lamp used in pharmaceutical product manufacturing or quality control.
(5) A  lamp used for spectroscopy and photometric applications, including ultraviolet-visible
spectroscopy, molecular spectroscopy, atomic absorption spectroscopy,  nondispersive infrared
(NDIR), Fourier  transform infrared (FTIR), medical analysis, ellipsometry, layer thickness measure-
ment, process monitoring or environmental monitoring.
(6) A lamp used by academic or research institutions exclusively for  conducting research
projects or experiments.
(7) A compact fluorescent lamp used to replace a lamp in a motor vehicle manufactured  on or
before January 1, 2020.
(8) A lamp purchased by a school district, as defined in ORS  332.002, for use in school
buildings.
(9) A lamp purchased by the owner or operator of one  or more facilities located in this
state that together comprise  more than one million square feet for use in the purchaser’s
facility. For purposes of this subsection,  the square footage of buildings owned or operated
by the purchaser’s parent company or subsidiary, or by an  entity that is similarly related to
the purchaser, may be used to determine the  total square footage of buildings owned or op-
erated by the purchaser.
SECTION 3a.
If House Bill 4066 becomes law, section  3 of this 2026 Act (amending ORS
459.488) is repealed and ORS 459.488, as amended by section 2, chapter 195, Oregon Laws 2025,
and section  22, chapter , Oregon Laws 2026 (Enrolled House Bill 4066), is amended to
read:
459.488. ORS 459.485 does not apply to:
(1) A lamp  used for image capture and projection, including photocopying, printing, directly or
in preprocessing, lithography, film and video projection and holography.
(2) A lamp that has a high proportion of ultraviolet light emission and is one of the following:
(a) A  lamp with high ultraviolet content that has ultraviolet power greater than two milliwatts
per kilolumen.
(b) A lamp for germicidal use, such as the destruction of DNA (deoxyribonucleic  acid), that
emits a peak radiation of approximately 253.7 nanometers.
(c) A lamp used for disinfection or fly trapping from which either:
(A) The radiation power emitted between  250 and 315 nanometers represents at least five per-
cent of the total radiation power emitted between 250 and 800 nanometers; or
(B) The radiation  power emitted between 315 and 400 nanometers represents at least 20 percent
of the total radiation power emitted between 250 and 800 nanometers.
(d) A lamp used  for the generation of ozone where the primary purpose is to emit radiation at
approximately 185.1 nanometers.
(e) A lamp used for coral zooxanthellae symbiosis from which the  radiation power emitted be-
tween 400 and 480 nanometers represents at  least 40 percent of the total radiation power emitted
between 250 and 800 nanometers.
Enrolled House Bill 4060 (HB 4060-A) Page 2
(f) Any lamp used in an electronic product designed to incorporate one or more ultraviolet lamps
and intended for  irradiation of any part of the living human body by ultraviolet radiation, with
wavelengths in air between 200 and 400 nanometers, to induce skin tanning.
(3) A  lamp used in a medical device or otherwise used for medical or veterinary diagnosis or
treatment.
(4) A lamp used in pharmaceutical product manufacturing or quality control.
(5) A  lamp used for spectroscopy and photometric applications, including ultraviolet-visible
spectroscopy, molecular spectroscopy, atomic absorption spectroscopy,  nondispersive infrared
(NDIR), Fourier  transform infrared (FTIR), medical analysis, ellipsometry, layer thickness measure-
ment, process monitoring or environmental monitoring.
(6) A lamp used by academic or research institutions exclusively for  conducting research
projects or experiments.
(7) A compact fluorescent lamp used to replace a lamp in a motor vehicle manufactured  on or
before January 1, 2020.
(8) A lamp purchased by a school district, as defined in ORS 332.002, or an  education service
district, as defined in ORS 334.003, for use in buildings used to provide educational  services to stu-
dents.
(9) A lamp purchased by the owner  or operator of one or more facilities located in this
state that together comprise more than one million square feet for use  in the purchaser’s
facility. For purposes of this subsection, the square footage  of buildings owned or operated
by the purchaser’s parent company or subsidiary, or by an  entity that is similarly related to
the purchaser, may be used to determine the total  square footage of buildings owned or op-
erated by the purchaser.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 459.488, as amended by section  2, chapter 195, Oregon Laws 2025, and section
3 of this 2026 Act, is amended to read:
459.488. ORS 459.485 does not apply to:
(1) A lamp used for image capture and projection, including photocopying, printing,  directly or
in preprocessing, lithography, film and video projection and holography.
(2) A lamp that has a high proportion of ultraviolet light emission and is one of the following:
(a) A lamp with high ultraviolet content that has ultraviolet power greater than two  milliwatts
per kilolumen.
(b) A lamp  for germicidal use, such as the destruction of DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid), that
emits a peak radiation of approximately 253.7 nanometers.
(c) A lamp used for disinfection or fly trapping from which either:
(A) The radiation power emitted between 250 and 315 nanometers  represents at least five per-
cent of the total radiation power emitted between 250 and 800 nanometers; or
(B) The radiation  power emitted between 315 and 400 nanometers represents at least 20 percent
of the total radiation power emitted between 250 and 800 nanometers.
(d) A lamp used for the generation of ozone where the primary purpose is to  emit radiation at
approximately 185.1 nanometers.
(e) A lamp used for  coral zooxanthellae symbiosis from which the radiation power emitted be-
tween 400 and 480 nanometers represents at least 40 percent  of the total radiation power emitted
between 250 and 800 nanometers.
(f) Any lamp used in an electronic product designed to incorporate one or more ultraviolet lamps
and intended for irradiation of any part of the living human body by ultraviolet  radiation, with
wavelengths in air between 200 and 400 nanometers, to induce skin tanning.
(3) A  lamp used in a medical device or otherwise used for medical or veterinary diagnosis or
treatment.
(4) A lamp used in pharmaceutical product manufacturing or quality control.
(5) A  lamp used for spectroscopy and photometric applications, including ultraviolet-visible
spectroscopy, molecular spectroscopy, atomic absorption spectroscopy,  nondispersive infrared
Enrolled House Bill 4060 (HB 4060-A) Page 3
(NDIR), Fourier  transform infrared (FTIR), medical analysis, ellipsometry, layer thickness measure-
ment, process monitoring or environmental monitoring.
(6) A lamp used by academic or research institutions exclusively for  conducting research
projects or experiments.
(7) A compact fluorescent lamp used to replace a lamp in a motor vehicle manufactured  on or
before January 1, 2020.
[(8) A lamp purchased by a school district, as defined in ORS 332.002, for use in school
buildings.]
[(9) A lamp purchased by the owner or operator of one or more facilities located in this state  that
together comprise more than one million square feet for use in the  purchaser’s facility. For purposes
of this subsection,  the square footage of buildings owned or operated by the purchaser’s parent com-
pany or subsidiary, or by an entity that is similarly related to the purchaser, may be used to  determine
the total square footage of buildings owned or operated by the purchaser. ]
SECTION 4a. If House Bill 4066 becomes law,  section 4 of this 2026 Act (amending ORS
459.488) is repealed and ORS 459.488, as amended by section 2, chapter 195, Oregon Laws 2025,
section 22, chapter , Oregon Laws 2026 (Enrolled  House Bill 4066), and section 3a of
this 2026 Act, is amended to read:
459.488. ORS 459.485 does not apply to:
(1) A lamp used for image capture and projection, including photocopying, printing,  directly or
in preprocessing, lithography, film and video projection and holography.
(2) A lamp that has a high proportion of ultraviolet light emission and is one of the following:
(a) A lamp with high ultraviolet content that has ultraviolet power greater than two  milliwatts
per kilolumen.
(b) A lamp  for germicidal use, such as the destruction of DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid), that
emits a peak radiation of approximately 253.7 nanometers.
(c) A lamp used for disinfection or fly trapping from which either:
(A) The radiation power emitted between 250 and 315 nanometers  represents at least five per-
cent of the total radiation power emitted between 250 and 800 nanometers; or
(B) The radiation  power emitted between 315 and 400 nanometers represents at least 20 percent
of the total radiation power emitted between 250 and 800 nanometers.
(d) A lamp used for the generation of ozone where the primary purpose is to  emit radiation at
approximately 185.1 nanometers.
(e) A lamp used for  coral zooxanthellae symbiosis from which the radiation power emitted be-
tween 400 and 480 nanometers represents at least 40 percent  of the total radiation power emitted
between 250 and 800 nanometers.
(f) Any lamp used in an electronic product designed to incorporate one or more ultraviolet lamps
and intended for irradiation of any part of the living human body by ultraviolet  radiation, with
wavelengths in air between 200 and 400 nanometers, to induce skin tanning.
(3) A  lamp used in a medical device or otherwise used for medical or veterinary diagnosis or
treatment.
(4) A lamp used in pharmaceutical product manufacturing or quality control.
(5) A  lamp used for spectroscopy and photometric applications, including ultraviolet-visible
spectroscopy, molecular spectroscopy, atomic absorption spectroscopy,  nondispersive infrared
(NDIR), Fourier  transform infrared (FTIR), medical analysis, ellipsometry, layer thickness measure-
ment, process monitoring or environmental monitoring.
(6) A lamp used by academic or research institutions exclusively for  conducting research
projects or experiments.
(7) A compact fluorescent lamp used to replace a lamp in a motor vehicle manufactured  on or
before January 1, 2020.
[(8) A lamp purchased by a school district, as defined in ORS 332.002,  or an education service
district, as defined in ORS 334.003, for use in buildings used to provide educational services to  stu-
dents.]
Enrolled House Bill 4060 (HB 4060-A) Page 4
[(9) A  lamp purchased by the owner or operator of one or more facilities located in this state that
together comprise more than one  million square feet for use in the purchaser’s facility. For purposes
of this subsection, the square footage of buildings owned or operated by the purchaser’s  parent com-
pany or subsidiary, or by an entity that is similarly related to the purchaser, may be used to  determine
the total square footage of buildings owned or operated by the purchaser. ]
SECTION 4b. If House Bill 4066 becomes  law, section 23, chapter , Oregon Laws
2026 (Enrolled House Bill 4066) (amending ORS 459.488), is repealed.
SECTION 5. The amendments to ORS 459.488 by  section 4 of this 2026 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2030.
SECTION 5a.  If House Bill 4066 becomes law, section 5 of this 2026 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  The amendments to ORS 459.488 by section [ 4] 4a of this 2026  Act become operative on
January [ 1] 2, 2030.
SECTION 6. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Long term care facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.015.
(b) “Residential care facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.400.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 441.060 and any rules adopted  pursuant to ORS 441.060, a long
term care  facility or a residential care facility is not required to submit for review plans and
specifications for alterations to an existing facility if the alterations  consist solely of alter-
ations required to replace light fixtures designed to use fluorescent lamps that are  subject
to the prohibition described in ORS 459.485 with an alternative style of light fixture.
(3) Nothing in this section relieves a long term care facility or a  residential care facility
from the obligation to comply with rules adopted under ORS 441.060 when  the replacement
of light fixtures is combined with any other unrelated alteration or addition to a  facility or
the construction of a new facility.
SECTION 7.
Section 6 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2030.
SECTION 8. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 17, 2026
Repassed by House March 4, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4060 (HB 4060-A) Page 5